Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1217.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 11 TLSB 1009XG (4) 91 sc/ns S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES. 1 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 2 to the department of administrative services for the fiscal 3 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 4 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 5 used for the purposes designated: 6 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 7 purposes: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,751,628 9 b. For the payment of utility costs: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,489,924 11 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated 12 for utility costs in this lettered paragraph that remain 13 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year 14 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure 15 for the purposes designated until the close of the succeeding 16 fiscal year. 17 c. For Terrace Hill operations: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 553,531 19 d. For state library services: 20 (1) For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 21 purposes: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,664,045 23 (2) For the enrich Iowa program established under section 24 8A.209: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,464,823 26 e. (1) For support of the stateâs historical resources: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,347,132 28 (2) The department shall coordinate historical and cultural 29 activities with the tourism office of the economic development 30 authority to promote attendance at the state historical 31 building and at the stateâs historic sites. 32 f. For administration and support of the stateâs historic 33 sites: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 430,305 35 -1- LSB 1009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 1/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 2. Any moneys and premiums collected by the department 1 for workersâ compensation shall be segregated into a separate 2 workersâ compensation fund in the state treasury to be used 3 for payment of state employeesâ workersâ compensation claims 4 and administrative costs. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , 5 unencumbered or unobligated moneys remaining in this workersâ 6 compensation fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not 7 revert but shall remain available for expenditure for purposes 8 of the fund in subsequent fiscal years. 9 Sec. 2. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES ââ 10 REVOLVING FUNDS. There is appropriated to the department of 11 administrative services for the fiscal year beginning July 12 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, from the revolving funds 13 designated in chapter 8A and from internal service funds 14 created by the department such amounts as the department deems 15 necessary for the operation of the department consistent with 16 the requirements of chapter 8A . 17 Sec. 3. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES ââ STATE 18 EMPLOYEE HEALTH INSURANCE ADMINISTRATION CHARGE. For the 19 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, 20 the monthly per contract administrative charge which may be 21 assessed by the department of administrative services shall be 22 $2.00 per contract on all health insurance plans administered 23 by the department. 24 Sec. 4. AUDITOR OF STATE. 25 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 26 to the office of the auditor of state for the fiscal year 27 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 28 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 29 purposes designated: 30 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 31 purposes: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,024,779 33 2. The auditor of state may retain additional full-time 34 equivalent positions as is reasonable and necessary to 35 -2- LSB 1009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 2/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ perform governmental subdivision audits which are reimbursable 1 pursuant to section 11.20 or 11.21 , to perform audits which are 2 requested by and reimbursable from the federal government, and 3 to perform work requested by and reimbursable from departments 4 or agencies pursuant to section 11.5A or 11.5B . The auditor 5 of state shall notify the department of management, the 6 legislative fiscal committee, and the legislative services 7 agency of the additional full-time equivalent positions 8 retained. 9 3. The auditor of state shall allocate moneys from the 10 appropriations in this section solely for audit work related to 11 the annual comprehensive financial report, federally required 12 audits, and investigations of embezzlement, theft, or other 13 significant financial irregularities until the audit of the 14 annual comprehensive financial report is complete. 15 Sec. 5. IOWA OFFICE OF CIVIL RIGHTS. There is appropriated 16 from the general fund of the state to the Iowa office of civil 17 rights for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 18 June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 19 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 20 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 21 purposes: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,419,253 23 b. The Iowa office of civil rights may enter into a contract 24 with a nonprofit organization to provide legal assistance to 25 resolve civil rights complaints. 26 Sec. 6. IOWA ETHICS AND CAMPAIGN DISCLOSURE BOARD. There 27 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 28 Iowa ethics and campaign disclosure board for the fiscal year 29 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 30 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 31 purposes designated: 32 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 33 purposes: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 910,105 35 -3- LSB 1009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 3/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Sec. 7. GOVERNOR AND LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR. There is 1 appropriated from the general fund of the state to the offices 2 of the governor and the lieutenant governor for the fiscal year 3 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 4 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 5 purposes designated: 6 1. GENERAL OFFICE 7 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 8 purposes: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,920,608 10 2. TERRACE HILL QUARTERS 11 For the governorâs quarters at Terrace Hill, including 12 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 146,503 14 Sec. 8. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND 15 LICENSING. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 16 state to the department of inspections, appeals, and licensing 17 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 18 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 19 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 20 1. ADMINISTRATION DIVISION 21 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 22 purposes: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 955,906 24 2. ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS DIVISION 25 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 26 purposes: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 676,051 28 3. INVESTIGATIONS 29 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 30 purposes: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,806,833 32 b. By December 1, 2025, the department shall submit a 33 report to the general assembly concerning the departmentâs 34 activities relative to fraud in public assistance programs 35 -4- LSB 1009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 4/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024, and ending June 1 30, 2025. The report shall include but is not limited to a 2 summary of the number of cases investigated, case outcomes, 3 overpayment dollars identified, amount of cost avoidance, and 4 actual dollars recovered. 5 4. HEALTH FACILITIES 6 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 7 purposes: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,293,552 9 b. The department shall make all of the following 10 information available to the public as part of the departmentâs 11 development efforts to revise the departmentâs internet site: 12 (1) The number of inspections of health facilities 13 conducted by the department annually by type of service 14 provider and type of inspection. 15 (2) The total annual operations budget for the department 16 that is associated with health facilities regulation, including 17 general fund appropriations and federal contract dollars 18 received by type of service provider inspected. 19 (3) The total number of full-time equivalent positions 20 in the department that are associated with health facilities 21 regulation, to include the number of full-time equivalent 22 positions serving in a supervisory capacity, and serving as 23 surveyors, inspectors, or monitors in the field by type of 24 service provider inspected. 25 (4) Identification of state and federal survey trends, 26 cited regulations, the scope and severity of deficiencies 27 identified, and federal and state fines assessed and collected 28 concerning nursing and assisted living facilities and programs. 29 c. It is the intent of the general assembly that the 30 department continuously solicit input from health facilities 31 regulated by the department to assess and improve the 32 departmentâs level of collaboration and to identify new 33 opportunities for cooperation. 34 5. EMPLOYMENT APPEAL BOARD 35 -5- LSB 1009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 5/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 1 purposes: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 531,497 3 b. The employment appeal board shall be reimbursed by the 4 department for all costs associated with hearings conducted 5 under chapter 91C related to contractor registration. The 6 board may expend, in addition to the amount appropriated under 7 this subsection, additional amounts as are directly billable 8 to the department under this subsection and to retain the 9 additional full-time equivalent positions as needed to conduct 10 hearings required pursuant to chapter 91C . 11 c. The employment appeal board may temporarily exceed and 12 draw more than the amount appropriated in this subsection and 13 incur a negative cash balance as long as there are receivables 14 of federal funds equal to or greater than the negative balance 15 and the amount appropriated in this subsection is not exceeded 16 at the close of the fiscal year. 17 6. FOOD AND CONSUMER SAFETY 18 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 19 purposes: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 547,673 21 7. LABOR SERVICES 22 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 23 purposes: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,004,316 25 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 26 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 27 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 28 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 29 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 30 8. DIVISION OF WORKERSâ COMPENSATION 31 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 32 purposes: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,434,641 34 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 35 -6- LSB 1009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 6/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 1 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 2 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 3 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 4 9. PROFESSIONAL LICENSING 5 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 6 purposes: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,645,276 8 10. APPROPRIATION REALLOCATION 9 Notwithstanding section 8.39 , the department of inspections, 10 appeals, and licensing, in consultation with the department of 11 management, may reallocate moneys appropriated in this section 12 as necessary to best fulfill the needs of the department 13 of inspections, appeals, and licensing provided for in the 14 appropriation. However, the department of inspections, 15 appeals, and licensing shall not reallocate moneys appropriated 16 for labor services or the division of workersâ compensation. 17 Sec. 9. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND LICENSING 18 ââ LICENSE OR REGISTRATION FEES. 19 1. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 20 June 30, 2026, the department of inspections, appeals, and 21 licensing shall collect any license or registration fees or 22 electronic transaction fees generated during the fiscal year 23 as a result of licensing and registration activities under 24 chapters 99B , 137C , 137D , and 137F . 25 2. From the fees collected by the department under this 26 section on behalf of a municipal corporation with which 27 the department has an agreement pursuant to section 137F.3 , 28 through a statewide electronic licensing system operated by 29 the department, notwithstanding section 137F.6, subsection 2 , 30 the department shall remit the amount of those fees to the 31 municipal corporation for whom the fees were collected less 32 any electronic transaction fees collected by the department to 33 enable electronic payment. 34 3. From the fees collected by the department under this 35 -7- LSB 1009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 7/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ section, other than those fees described in subsection 2, 1 the department shall deposit the amount of $800,000 into the 2 general fund of the state prior to June 30, 2026. 3 4. From the fees collected by the department under this 4 section, other than those fees described in subsections 2 and 5 3, the department shall retain the remainder of the fees for 6 the purposes of enforcing the provisions of chapters 99B , 137C , 7 137D , and 137F . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys retained 8 by the department pursuant to this subsection that remain 9 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year 10 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure 11 for the purposes of enforcing the provisions of chapters 99B , 12 137C , 137D , and 137F during the succeeding fiscal year. The 13 department shall provide an annual report to the department 14 of management and the legislative services agency on fees 15 billed and collected and expenditures from the moneys retained 16 by the department in a format determined by the department 17 of management in consultation with the legislative services 18 agency. 19 Sec. 10. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND LICENSING 20 ââ HOUSING TRUST FUND. There is appropriated from the housing 21 trust fund created in section 16.181 to the department of 22 inspections, appeals, and licensing for the fiscal year 23 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 24 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 25 purposes designated: 26 For professional licensing salaries, support, maintenance, 27 and miscellaneous purposes: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 62,317 29 Sec. 11. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND LICENSING 30 ââ RACING AND GAMING COMMISSION ââ RACING AND GAMING 31 REGULATION. There is appropriated from the gaming regulatory 32 revolving fund established in section 99F.20 to the racing and 33 gaming commission of the department of inspections, appeals, 34 and licensing for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 35 -8- LSB 1009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 8/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof 1 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 2 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 3 purposes for regulation, administration, and enforcement of 4 pari-mutuel racetracks, excursion boat gambling, gambling 5 structure laws, sports wagering, and fantasy sports contests: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,448,600 7 Sec. 12. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND LICENSING 8 ââ ROAD USE TAX FUND. There is appropriated from the road 9 use tax fund created in section 312.1 to the administrative 10 hearings division of the department of inspections, appeals, 11 and licensing for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 12 ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof 13 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 14 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 15 purposes: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,623,897 17 Sec. 13. DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES 18 ââ COMMERCE REVOLVING FUND. There is appropriated from the 19 commerce revolving fund created in section 546.12 to the 20 department of insurance and financial services for the fiscal 21 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 22 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 23 used for the purposes designated: 24 1. BANKING DIVISION 25 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 26 purposes: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 14,343,523 28 2. CREDIT UNION DIVISION 29 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 30 purposes: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,875,989 32 3. INSURANCE DIVISION 33 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 34 purposes: 35 -9- LSB 1009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 9/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,326,541 1 b. The insurance division expenditures for examination 2 purposes may exceed the projected receipts, refunds, and 3 reimbursements, estimated pursuant to section 505.7, subsection 4 7, including the expenditures for retention of additional 5 personnel, if the expenditures are fully reimbursable and the 6 division first does all of the following: 7 (1) Notifies the department of management, the legislative 8 services agency, and the legislative fiscal committee of the 9 need for the expenditures. 10 (2) Files with each of the entities named in subparagraph 11 (1) the legislative and regulatory justification for the 12 expenditures, along with an estimate of the expenditures. 13 Sec. 14. DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES ââ 14 GENERAL FUND. There is appropriated from the general fund of 15 the state to the department of insurance and financial services 16 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 17 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 18 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 19 For deposit in the captive insurance regulatory and 20 supervision fund created in section 521J.12 for use as provided 21 in section 521J.12, including salaries, support, maintenance, 22 and miscellaneous purposes: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 450,000 24 Sec. 15. DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT. There is appropriated 25 from the general fund of the state to the department of 26 management for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 27 ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof 28 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 29 1. For enterprise resource planning, providing for a 30 salary model administrator, conducting performance audits, 31 the departmentâs LEAN process, criminal and juvenile justice 32 planning, and for salaries, support, maintenance, and 33 miscellaneous purposes: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,723,141 35 -10- LSB 1009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 10/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 2. For the division of information technology, and for 1 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,421,887 3 Of the moneys appropriated in this subsection, $325,000 4 is allocated to providing cybersecurity services to local 5 governments. 6 Sec. 16. DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT ââ INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY 7 ââ REVOLVING AND INTERNAL FUNDS. 8 1. There is appropriated to the department of management 9 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 10 30, 2026, from the revolving funds designated in chapter 8, 11 subchapter XI , and from internal service funds created under 12 section 8.92, such amounts as the department deems necessary 13 for the operation of the department pursuant to and consistent 14 with the requirements of chapter 8, subchapter XI . 15 2. a. Notwithstanding section 321A.3, subsection 1 , for the 16 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, 17 the first $750,000 collected and transferred to the treasurer 18 of state with respect to the fees for transactions involving 19 the furnishing of a certified abstract of a vehicle operating 20 record under section 321A.3, subsection 1 , shall be transferred 21 to the IowAccess revolving fund created in section 8.90 for 22 the purposes of developing, implementing, maintaining, and 23 expanding electronic access to government records as provided 24 by law. 25 b. All fees collected with respect to transactions 26 involving IowAccess shall be deposited in the IowAccess 27 revolving fund created under section 8.90 and shall be used 28 only for the support of IowAccess projects. 29 Sec. 17. DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT ââ ROAD USE TAX 30 FUND. There is appropriated from the road use tax fund created 31 in section 312.1 to the department of management for the fiscal 32 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 33 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 34 used for the purposes designated: 35 -11- LSB 1009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 11/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 1 purposes: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 56,000 3 Sec. 18. IPERS ââ GENERAL OFFICE. There is appropriated 4 from the Iowa public employeesâ retirement fund created in 5 section 97B.7 to the Iowa public employeesâ retirement system 6 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 7 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 8 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 9 1. For salaries, support, maintenance, and other 10 operational purposes to pay the costs of the Iowa public 11 employeesâ retirement system: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 23,955,503 13 2. a. For a pension administrative system: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 60,000,000 15 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 16 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 17 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 18 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 19 end of the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2035. 20 Sec. 19. IOWA PUBLIC INFORMATION BOARD. There is 21 appropriated from the general fund of the state to the Iowa 22 public information board for the fiscal year beginning July 23 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or 24 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 25 designated: 26 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 27 purposes: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 369,786 29 Sec. 20. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE. 30 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 31 to the department of revenue for the fiscal year beginning July 32 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or 33 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 34 designated: 35 -12- LSB 1009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 12/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 1 purposes: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15,548,283 3 b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, the 4 department shall use $400,000 to pay the direct costs of 5 compliance related to the collection and distribution of local 6 sales and services taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 423B . 7 2. The director of revenue shall prepare and issue a state 8 appraisal manual and the revisions to the state appraisal 9 manual as provided in section 421.17, subsection 17 , without 10 cost to a city or county. 11 Sec. 21. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE ââ MOTOR VEHICLE FUEL TAX 12 FUND. There is appropriated from the motor vehicle fuel tax 13 fund created pursuant to section 452A.77 to the department of 14 revenue for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 15 June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 16 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 17 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 18 purposes, and for administration and enforcement of the 19 provisions of chapter 452A and the motor vehicle fuel tax 20 program: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,305,775 22 Sec. 22. SECRETARY OF STATE. There is appropriated from 23 the general fund of the state to the office of the secretary of 24 state for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 25 June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 26 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 27 1. ADMINISTRATION AND ELECTIONS 28 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 29 purposes: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,593,508 31 b. The state department or agency that provides data 32 processing services to support voter registration file 33 maintenance and storage shall provide those services without 34 charge. 35 -13- LSB 1009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 13/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 2. BUSINESS SERVICES 1 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 2 purposes: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,589,216 4 Sec. 23. SECRETARY OF STATE ââ ADDRESS CONFIDENTIALITY 5 PROGRAM REVOLVING FUND. There is appropriated from the address 6 confidentiality program revolving fund created in section 9.8 7 to the office of the secretary of state for the fiscal year 8 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 9 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 10 purposes designated: 11 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 12 purposes: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 195,400 14 Sec. 24. SECRETARY OF STATE FILING FEES REFUND. 15 Notwithstanding the obligation to collect fees pursuant to the 16 provisions of section 489.122, subsection 1 , paragraphs âcâ and 17 âsâ, section 490.122, subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ, and section 18 504.113, subsection 1 , paragraphs âaâ, âcâ, âdâ, âjâ, âkâ, 19 âlâ, and âmâ, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, the 20 secretary of state may refund these fees to the filer pursuant 21 to rules established by the secretary of state. The decision 22 of the secretary of state not to issue a refund under rules 23 established by the secretary of state is final and not subject 24 to review pursuant to chapter 17A . 25 Sec. 25. TREASURER OF STATE. 26 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 27 state to the office of treasurer of state for the fiscal year 28 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 29 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 30 purposes designated: 31 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 32 purposes: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,065,211 34 2. The office of treasurer of state shall supply 35 -14- LSB 1009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 14/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ administrative support for the executive council. 1 Sec. 26. TREASURER OF STATE ââ ROAD USE TAX FUND. There 2 is appropriated from the road use tax fund created in section 3 312.1 to the office of treasurer of state for the fiscal year 4 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 5 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 6 purposes designated: 7 For enterprise resource management costs related to the 8 distribution of road use tax fund moneys: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 316,788 10 Sec. 27. IOWA UTILITIES COMMISSION. 11 1. There is appropriated from the commerce revolving fund 12 created in section 546.12 to the Iowa utilities commission for 13 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 14 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 15 to be used for the purposes designated: 16 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 17 purposes: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 11,659,071 19 2. The utilities commission may expend additional moneys, 20 including moneys for additional personnel, if those additional 21 expenditures are actual expenses which exceed the moneys 22 budgeted for utility regulation and the expenditures are fully 23 reimbursable. Before the commission expends or encumbers an 24 amount in excess of the moneys budgeted for regulation, the 25 commission shall first do all of the following: 26 a. Notify the department of management, the legislative 27 services agency, and the legislative fiscal committee of the 28 need for the expenditures. 29 b. File with each of the entities named in paragraph âaâ the 30 legislative and regulatory justification for the expenditures, 31 along with an estimate of the expenditures. 32 Sec. 28. CHARGES ââ IOWA UTILITIES COMMISSION AND 33 DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES. The Iowa 34 utilities commission and each division of the department of 35 -15- LSB 1009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 15/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ insurance and financial services shall include in its charges 1 assessed or revenues generated an amount sufficient to cover 2 the amount stated in its appropriation and any state-assessed 3 indirect costs determined by the department of administrative 4 services. 5 Sec. 29. IOWA PRODUCTS. As a condition of receiving an 6 appropriation, any agency appropriated moneys pursuant to this 7 Act shall give first preference when purchasing a product to an 8 Iowa product or a product produced by an Iowa-based business. 9 Second preference shall be given to a United States product or 10 a product produced by a business based in the United States. 11 Sec. 30. LIMITATION OF STANDING APPROPRIATION. 12 Notwithstanding the standing appropriation in the following 13 designated section for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, 14 and ending June 30, 2026, the amount appropriated from the 15 general fund of the state pursuant to that section for the 16 following designated purpose shall not exceed the following 17 amount: 18 For the enforcement of chapter 453D relating to tobacco 19 product manufacturers under section 453D.8 : 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 17,525 21